Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 7 CONTROL OF SOIL EROSION AND SEDIMENTATION
12-7-17. Exemptions.

This chapter shall not apply to the following activities:

Surface mining, as the same is defined in Code Section 12-4-72;

Granite quarrying and land clearing for such quarrying;

Such minor land-disturbing activities as home gardens and individual home landscaping, repairs, maintenance work, fences, and other related activities which result in minor soil erosion;

The construction of single-family residences, when such construction disturbs less than one acre and is not a part of a larger common plan of development or sale with a planned disturbance of equal to or greater than one acre and not otherwise exempted under this paragraph; provided, however, that construction of any such residence shall conform to the minimum requirements as set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 12-7-6 and this paragraph. For single-family residence construction covered by the provisions of this paragraph, there shall be a buffer zone between the residence and any state waters classified as trout streams pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title. In any such buffer zone, no land-disturbing activity shall be constructed between the residence and the point where vegetation has been wrested by normal stream flow or wave action from the banks of the trout waters. For primary trout waters, the buffer zone shall be at least 50 horizontal feet, and no variance to a smaller buffer shall be granted. For secondary trout waters, the buffer zone shall be at least 50 horizontal feet, but the director may grant variances to no less than 25 feet. Regardless of whether a trout stream is primary or secondary, for first order trout waters, which are streams into which no other streams flow except for springs, the buffer shall be at least 25 horizontal feet, and no variance to a smaller buffer shall be granted. The minimum requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-7-6 and the buffer zones provided by this paragraph shall be enforced by the issuing authority;

Agricultural operations as defined in Code Section 1-3-3 to include those practices involving the establishment, cultivation, or harvesting of products of the field or orchard; the preparation and planting of pasture land; farm ponds; dairy operations; livestock and poultry management practices; and the construction of farm buildings;

Forestry land management practices, including harvesting; provided, however, that when such exempt forestry practices cause or result in land-disturbing or other activities otherwise prohibited in a buffer, as established in paragraphs (15) and (16) of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-7-6, no other land-disturbing activities, except for normal forest management practices, shall be allowed on the entire property upon which the forestry practices were conducted for a period of three years after the completion of such forestry practices;

Any project carried out under the technical supervision of the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture;

Any project involving less than one acre of disturbed area; provided, however, that this exemption shall not apply to any land-disturbing activity within a larger common plan of development or sale with a planned disturbance of equal to or greater than one acre or within 200 feet of the bank of any state waters, and for purposes of this paragraph, "state waters" excludes channels and drainageways which have water in them only during and immediately after rainfall events and intermittent streams which do not have water in them year round; provided, however, that any person responsible for a project which involves less than one acre, which involves land-disturbing activity, and which is within 200 feet of any such excluded channel or drainageway must prevent sediment from moving beyond the boundaries of the property on which such project is located and provided, further, that nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent a city or county which is a local issuing authority from regulating any such project which is not specifically exempted by paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (9), or (10) of this Code section;

Construction or maintenance projects, or both, undertaken or financed in whole or in part, or both, by the Department of Transportation, the Georgia Highway Authority, or the State Road and Tollway Authority; or any road construction or maintenance project, or both, undertaken by any county or municipality; provided, however, that construction or maintenance projects of the Department of Transportation or the State Road and Tollway Authority which disturb one or more contiguous acres of land shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 12-7-7.1; except where the Department of Transportation, the Georgia Highway Authority, or the State Road and Tollway Authority is a secondary permittee for a project located within a larger common plan of development or sale under the state general permit, in which case a copy of a notice of intent under the state general permit shall be submitted to the local issuing authority, the local issuing authority shall enforce compliance with the minimum requirements set forth in Code Section 12-7-6 as if a permit had been issued, and violations shall be subject to the same penalties as violations by permit holders;

Any land-disturbing activities conducted by any electric membership corporation or municipal electrical system or any public utility under the regulatory jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission, any utility under the regulatory jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, any cable television system as defined in Code Section 36-18-1, or any agency or instrumentality of the United States engaged in the generation, transmission, or distribution of power; except where an electric membership corporation or municipal electrical system or any public utility under the regulatory jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission, any utility under the regulatory jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, any cable television system as defined in Code Section 36-18-1, or any agency or instrumentality of the United States engaged in the generation, transmission, or distribution of power is a secondary permittee for a project located within a larger common plan of development or sale under the state general permit, in which case the local issuing authority shall enforce compliance with the minimum requirements set forth in Code Section 12-7-6 as if a permit had been issued, and violations shall be subject to the same penalties as violations by permit holders; and

Public water system reservoirs.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 11; Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1224, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 9; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1650, § 8; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 150, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1430, § 5; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1673, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 892, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, "Public water system reservoirs" was substituted for "Public Water System Reservoirs" in paragraph (a)(11) (now paragraph (11)).

12-7-18. Effect of chapter on requirements of the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act."

No provision of this chapter shall authorize any person to violate Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act," or the rules and regulations promulgated and approved under said article or to pollute any waters of this state as defined in said article.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 13; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

12-7-19. Education and training requirements; required programs; instructor qualifications; expiration of certification.

Persons involved in land development design, review, permitting, construction, monitoring, or inspection or any land-disturbing activity shall meet the education and training certification requirements, dependent on his or her level of involvement with the process, as developed by the commission in accordance with this Code section and in consultation with the division and the Stakeholder Advisory Board created pursuant to Code Section 12-7-20.

On or after May 14, 2007, for each site on which land-disturbing activity occurs, each entity or person acting as either a primary, secondary, or tertiary permittee, as defined in the state general permit, shall have as a minimum one person who is in responsible charge of erosion and sedimentation control activities on behalf of said entity or person and meets the applicable education or training certification requirements developed by the commission present on site whenever land-disturbing activities are conducted on that site. A project site shall herein be defined as any land disturbance site or multiple sites within a larger common plan of development or sale permitted by an owner or operator for compliance with the state general permit.

Persons or entities involved in projects not requiring a state general permit but otherwise requiring certified personnel on site may contract with certified persons to meet the requirements of this chapter.

If a state general permittee who has operational control of land-disturbing activities for a site has met the certification requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section, then any person or entity involved in land-disturbing activity at that site and operating in a subcontractor capacity for such permittee shall have until December 31, 2007, to meet those educational requirements specified in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-7-19 and shall not be required to meet any educational requirements that exceed those specified in said paragraph.

No less than the following training programs shall be established:

A fundamentals seminar (Level 1) will be established which provides sufficient training to all participants as to the applicable laws, requirements, processes, and latest means and methods recognized by this state to effectively control erosion and sedimentation;

An advanced fundamentals seminar (Level 1) will be established which provides additional details of installation and maintenance of best management practices for both regulatory and nonregulatory inspectors and others;

An introduction to design seminar (Level 2) will be established which provides required training to design and review a successful erosion, sedimentation, and pollution control plan;

An awareness seminar (Level 1) will be established which does not exceed two hours in duration and which provides information regarding the erosion and sediment control practices and processes in the state and which will include an overview of the systems, laws, and roles of the participants; and

A trainer and instructor seminar will be established for both Level 1 and Level 2 trainers and instructors which will provide the minimum training as to applicable laws and best management practices and design of erosion, sedimentation, and pollution control plans in this state.

Trainer and instructor qualifications will be established with the following minimum requirements:

Level 1 trainers and instructors shall meet at least the following minimum requirements and any other requirements as set by the commission:

Education: four-year college degree or five years' experience in the field of erosion and sediment control;

Experience: five-years' experience in the field of erosion and sediment control. Where years of experience is used in lieu of the education requirement of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a total of ten years' field experience is required;

Approval by the commission and the Stakeholder Advisory Board; and

Successful completion of the Level 1 trainer and instructor seminar found in paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of this Code section; and

Level 2 trainers and instructors shall meet at least the minimum requirements of a Level 1 trainer or instructor, any other requirements as set by the commission, and successful completion of the Level 2 trainer and instructor seminar created under paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section, the commission shall establish and any person desirous of holding certification must obtain a passing grade as established by the Stakeholder Advisory Board on a final exam covering the material taught in each mandatory seminar; provided, however, that there shall be no final exam requirement for purposes of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section. Final exams may, at the discretion of the commission, serve in lieu of attendance at the seminar. Any person shall be authorized to administer a final examination for any seminar for which he or she was the instructor.

A certification provided by achieving the requirements established by the commission shall expire no later than three years after its issuance.

A certified individual shall be required to attend and participate in at least four hours of approved continuing education courses, as established by the commission, every three years.

A certification may be extended or renewed by meeting requirements established by the commission.

Revocation procedures may be established by the commission in consultation with the division and the Stakeholder Advisory Board.

(Code 1981, §

12-7-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5; Ga. L. 2007, p. 127, § 3/HB 463.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, "May 14, 2007" was substituted for "the effective date of this subsection" near the beginning of paragraph (a)(2).

12-7-20. Creation of Stakeholder Advisory Board; responsibilities; procedures.

There shall be a Stakeholder Advisory Board to consist of not more than 13 members.

Members shall be appointed by the Governor, shall serve at the pleasure thereof, and shall represent the following interests:

The division;

The commission;

Soil and water conservation districts;

The Department of Transportation;

Municipal governments;

County governments;

Public utilities;

The engineering and design community;

The construction community;

The development community;

The environmental community;

The Erosion and Sediment Control Overview Council; and

Educators.

The Stakeholder Advisory Board shall elect one of its members as chairperson. The chairperson shall call all meetings of the Stakeholder Advisory Board.

The Stakeholder Advisory Board shall be responsible for working together with the division and the commission to establish, evaluate, and maintain the education and training program established pursuant to Code Section 12-7-19, including but not limited to reviewing course curricula, educational materials, and exam and testing procedures; evaluating trainer and instructor qualifications; and reviewing audit results performed by the commission.

The Stakeholder Advisory Board may conduct such meetings at such places and at such times as it may deem necessary or convenient to enable it to exercise fully and effectively its powers, perform its duties, and accomplish the objectives and purposes of this Code section. Meetings shall be held on the written notice of the chairperson. The notice of a meeting shall set forth the date, time, and place of the meeting. Minutes shall be kept of all meetings.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the Stakeholder Advisory Board. The powers and duties of the Stakeholder Advisory Board shall be transacted, exercised, and performed only pursuant to an affirmative vote of a majority of those members present at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Members of the Stakeholder Advisory Board shall not be entitled to any compensation for the rendering of their services to the Stakeholder Advisory Board.

(Code 1981, §

12-7-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on the 2003 enactment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 244 (2003).

12-7-21. Appointment of panel to study controls implemented pursuant to chapter; procedure and operation of panel.

Reserved.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, the designation of this Code section was reserved.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was repealed under its own terms effective July 1, 2006, and was based on Code 1981,

§

12-7-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 224,

§

5.

12-7-22. Electronic filing and reporting system.

In order to achieve efficiencies and economies for both the division and the regulated community by the use of electronic filing for certain application and reporting requirements of this chapter and National Pollution Discharge Elimination System permits, the division and the Pollution Prevention Assistance Division of the department shall jointly work toward implementing such an electronic filing and reporting system as soon as practicable and allowable under federal regulations.

(Code 1981, §

12-7-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on the 2003 enactment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 244 (2003).